California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) The programming provided by the State Department of State Hospitals in facilities shall be consistent with current institutional standards for the treatment of sex offenders, and shall be based on a structured treatment protocol developed by the State Department of State Hospitals. The protocol shall describe the number and types of treatment components that are provided in the program, and shall specify how assessment data will be used to determine the course of treatment for each individual offender. The protocol shall also specify measures that will be used to assess treatment progress and changes with respect to the individual’s risk of reoffense.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as to requirements relating to fire and life safety of persons with mental illness, and consistent with information and standards described in subdivision (c), the
 State Department of State Hospitals is authorized to provide the programming using an outpatient/day treatment model, wherein treatment is provided by licensed professional clinicians in living units not licensed as health facility beds within a secure facility setting, on less than a 24-hour a day basis. The State Department of State Hospitals shall take into consideration the unique characteristics, individual needs, and choices of persons committed under this article, including whether or not a person needs antipsychotic medication, whether or not a person has physical medical conditions, and whether or not a person chooses to participate in a specified course of offender treatment. The State Department of State Hospitals shall ensure that policies and procedures are in place that address changes in patient needs, as well as patient choices, and respond to treatment needs in a timely fashion. The State Department of State Hospitals, in implementing this subdivision, shall be allowed by the State
 Department of Public Health to place health facility beds at Coalinga State Hospital in suspense in order to meet the mental health and medical needs of the patient population. Coalinga State Hospital may remove all or any portion of its voluntarily suspended beds into active license status by request to the State Department of Public Health. The facility’s request shall be granted unless the suspended beds fail to comply with current operational requirements for licensure.

(e) The department shall meet with each patient who has chosen not to participate in a specific course of offender treatment during monthly treatment planning conferences. At these conferences the department shall explain treatment options available to the patient, offer and re-offer treatment to the patient, seek to obtain the patient’s cooperation in the recommended treatment options, and document these steps in the patient’s health record. The fact that a patient has
 chosen not to participate in treatment in the past shall not establish that the patient continues to choose not to participate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 145.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6607.

(a) If the Director of State Hospitals determines that the person’s diagnosed mental disorder has so changed that the person is not likely to commit acts of predatory sexual violence while under supervision and treatment in the community, the director shall forward a report and recommendation for conditional release in accordance with Section 6608 to the county attorney designated in subdivision (i) of Section 6601, the attorney of record for the person, and the committing court.

(b) When a report and recommendation for conditional release is filed by the Director of State Hospitals pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall set a hearing in accordance with the procedures set forth
 in Section 6608.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 69.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.

(a) A person who has been committed as a sexually violent predator shall be permitted to petition the court for conditional release with or without the recommendation or concurrence of the Director of State Hospitals. If a person has previously filed a petition for conditional release without the concurrence of the director and the court determined, either upon review of the petition or following a hearing, that the petition was frivolous or that the committed person’s condition had not so changed that the person would not be a danger to others in that it is not likely that the person will engage in sexually violent criminal behavior if placed under supervision and treatment in the community, the court shall deny the subsequent petition unless it contains
 facts upon which a court could find that the condition of the committed person had so changed that a hearing was warranted. Upon receipt of a first or subsequent petition from a committed person without the concurrence of the director, the court shall endeavor whenever possible to review the petition and determine if it is based upon frivolous grounds and, if so, shall deny the petition without a hearing. The person petitioning for conditional release under this subdivision shall be entitled to assistance of counsel in all hearings under this section. The person petitioning for conditional release shall serve a copy of the petition on the State Department of State Hospitals at the time the petition is filed with the court.

(b) The procedure for a conditional release hearing in a case where the county of domicile has not yet been determined
 shall be as follows:

(1) If the court deems the petition not frivolous pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall give notice to the attorney designated in subdivision (i) of Section 6601, the retained or appointed attorney for the committed person, and the Director of State Hospitals of its intention to set a conditional release hearing. The person petitioning for conditional release, the Director of State Hospitals, and the designated attorney of the county of commitment shall notify the court within 30 court days of receipt of this notice if it appears that a county other than the county of commitment may be the county of domicile.

(2) If no county other than the county of commitment appears to be the county of domicile, the court shall determine, consistent with
 Section 6608.5, that the county of commitment is the county of domicile.

(3) If it appears or there are allegations that one or more counties, other than the county of commitment, may be the county of domicile, the court shall set a hearing to determine the county of domicile, consistent with the provisions of Section 6608.5. The court shall, at least 30 court days prior to the hearing, give notice of the domicile hearing to the persons listed in paragraph (1) and to the designated attorney for any county that is alleged to be the county of domicile. Persons listed in this paragraph and paragraph (1) may, at least 10 court days prior to the hearing, file and serve declarations, documentary evidence, and other pleadings, that are specific only to the issue of domicile. The court may, consistent with Section 6608.5, decide the issue of domicile
 solely on the pleadings, or additionally permit, in the interests of justice, argument and testimony.

(4) After determining the county of domicile pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3), the court shall set a date for a conditional release hearing and shall give notice of the hearing at least 30 court days before the hearing to the persons described in paragraph (1) and the designated attorney for the county of domicile.

(5) (A) If the county of domicile is different than the county of commitment, the designated attorney for the county of domicile and the designated attorney for the county of commitment may mutually agree that the designated attorney for the county of domicile will represent the state at the conditional release hearing. If the designated attorneys
 do not make this agreement, the designated attorney for the county of commitment will represent the state at the conditional release hearing.

(B) At least 20 court days before the conditional release hearing, the designated attorney for the county of commitment shall give notice to the parties listed in paragraph (1) and to the court whether the state will be represented by the designated attorney of the county of domicile or the designated attorney of the county of commitment.

(C) The designated attorney for the county of domicile and the designated attorney for the county of commitment should cooperate with each other to ensure that all relevant evidence is submitted on behalf of the state. No attorney other than the designated attorney for the county representing the state
 shall appear on behalf of the state at the conditional release hearing.

(6) The court’s determination of a county of domicile shall govern the current and any subsequent petition for conditional release under this section.

(7) For the purpose of this subdivision, the term “county of domicile” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 6608.5.

(8) For purposes of this section, the term “designated attorney of the county of commitment” means the attorney designated in subdivision (i) of Section 6601 in the county of commitment.

(9) For purposes of this section, the term “designated attorney for the county of domicile” means the attorney designated in subdivision
 (i) of Section 6601 in the county of domicile.

(c) The proceedings for a conditional release hearing in a case where the court has previously determined the county of domicile shall be as follows:

(1) If the court determines, pursuant to subdivision (a), that the petition is not frivolous, the court shall give notice of the hearing date at least 30 days prior to the hearing to the designated attorneys for the county of domicile and the county of commitment, the retained or appointed attorney for the petitioner, and the Director of State Hospitals.

(2) Representation of the state at the conditional release hearing shall be pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) If a committed person has been conditionally released by a court to a county other than the county of domicile, and the jurisdiction of the person has been transferred to that county, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 6608.5, the notice specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be given to the designated attorney of the county of placement, who shall represent the state in any further proceedings.

(2) The term “county of placement” means the county where the court has placed a person who is granted conditional release.

(e) If the petition for conditional release is made without the consent of the director of the treatment facility, no action shall be taken on the petition by the court without first obtaining the written recommendation
 of the director of the treatment facility.

(f) A hearing upon the petition shall not be held until the person who is committed has been under commitment for confinement and care in a facility designated by the Director of State Hospitals for not less than one year from the date of the order of commitment. A hearing upon the petition shall not be held until the community program director designated by the State Department of State Hospitals submits a report to the court that makes a recommendation as to the appropriateness of placing the person in a state-operated forensic conditional release program.

(g) The court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the person committed would be a danger to the health and safety of others in that it is likely that the person will engage in
 sexually
 violent criminal behavior due to the person’s diagnosed mental disorder if under supervision and treatment in the community. The attorney designated pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) shall represent the state and may have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The committed person shall have the right to the appointment of experts, if the committed person so requests. If the court at the hearing determines that the committed person would not be a danger to others due to the committed person’s diagnosed mental disorder while under supervision and treatment in the community, the court shall order the committed person placed with an appropriate forensic conditional release program operated by the state for one year. A substantial portion of the state-operated forensic conditional release program shall include outpatient supervision and treatment. The court
 shall retain jurisdiction of the person throughout the course of the program, except as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 6608.5.

(h) Before placing a committed person in a state-operated forensic conditional release program, the community program director designated by the State Department of State Hospitals shall submit a written recommendation to the court stating which forensic conditional release program is most appropriate for supervising and treating the committed person. If the court does not accept the community program director’s recommendation, the court shall specify the reason or reasons for its order on the record. The procedures described in Sections 1605 to 1610, inclusive, of the Penal Code shall apply to the person placed in the forensic conditional release program.

(i) If the court determines that the person should be transferred to a state-operated forensic conditional release program, the community program director, or their designee, shall make the necessary placement arrangements and, within 30 days after receiving notice of the court’s finding, the person shall be placed in the community in accordance with the treatment and supervision plan unless good cause for not doing so is presented to the court.

(j) If the court denies the petition to place the person in an appropriate forensic conditional release program, the person may not file a new application until one year has elapsed from the date of the denial.

(k) In a hearing authorized by this section, the committed person shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance of the
 evidence, unless the report required by Section 6604.9 determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and that conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, in which case the burden of proof shall be on the state to show, by a preponderance of the evidence, that conditional release is not appropriate.

(l) Time spent in a conditional release program pursuant to this section shall not count toward the term of commitment under this article unless the person is confined in a locked facility by the conditional release program, in which case the time spent in a
 locked facility shall count toward the term of commitment.

(m) After a minimum of one year on conditional release, the committed person, with or without the recommendation or concurrence of the Director of State Hospitals, may petition the court for unconditional discharge. The court shall use the procedures described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 6605 to determine if the person should be unconditionally discharged from commitment on the basis that, by reason of a diagnosed mental disorder, the person is no longer a danger to the health and safety of others in that it is not likely that the person will engage in sexually violent criminal behavior.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 880, Sec. 1.   (SB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.1.

A person who is released on outpatient status or granted conditional release pursuant to this article shall be monitored by a global positioning system (GPS) until the person is unconditionally discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 104, Sec. 1.   (AB 1641)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.5.

(a) After a judicial determination that a person would not be a danger to the health and safety of others in that it is not likely that the person will engage in sexually violent criminal behavior due to the person’s diagnosed mental disorder while under supervision and treatment in the community, a person who is conditionally released pursuant to this article shall be placed in the county of domicile of the person prior to the person’s incarceration, unless both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The court finds that extraordinary circumstances require placement outside the county of domicile as set forth in Section 6608.6.

(2) The designated county of placement was given prior notice
 and an opportunity to comment on the proposed placement of the committed person in the county, according to procedures set forth in Section 6609.1.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, “county of domicile” means the county where the person has their true, fixed, and permanent home and principal residence and to which the person has manifested the intention of returning whenever the person is absent. For the purposes of determining the county of domicile, the court shall consider information found on a California driver’s license, California identification card, recent rent or utility receipt, printed personalized checks or other recent banking documents showing that person’s name and address, or information contained in an arrest record, probation officer’s report, trial transcript, or other court
 document. If no information can be identified or verified, the county of domicile of the individual shall be considered to be the county in which the person was arrested for the crime for which the person was last incarcerated in the state prison or from which the person was last returned from parole.

(2) In a case where the person committed a crime while being held for treatment in a state hospital, or while being confined in a state prison or local jail facility, the county wherein that facility was located shall not be considered the county of domicile unless the person resided in that county prior to being housed in the hospital, prison, or jail.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “extraordinary circumstances” means circumstances that would inordinately limit the
 department’s ability to effect conditional release of the person in the county of domicile in accordance with Section 6608 or any other provision of this article, and the procedures described in Sections 1605 to 1610, inclusive, of the Penal Code.

(d) (1) The counsel for the committed individual; the sheriff or the chief of police of the locality for placement, the county counsel, and the district attorney
 from the county of domicile; and the sheriff or the chief of police of, and the county counsel and the district attorney of, an alternative placement locality where a potential placement location has been identified and is being considered by the department for potential recommendation to the court for placement of the
 individual; or their designees, shall provide assistance and consultation in the department’s process of locating and securing housing within the county for persons committed as sexually violent predators who are about to be conditionally released under Section 6608. Upon notification by the department of a person’s potential or expected conditional release under Section 6608, the counsel for the committed individual; the sheriff or the chief of police of the locality for placement, the county
 counsel, and the district attorney of the county of domicile; and the sheriff or chief of police of, and the county counsel and district attorney of, an alternative placement locality; or their designees, shall provide appropriate contact information for their respective office to the department, at least 60 days before the date of the potential or expected release.

(2) The department shall convene a committee with the participants listed in paragraph (1) for the purpose of obtaining relevant assistance and consultation information in order to secure suitable housing for the person to be conditionally released.
 Notwithstanding the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), these committee meetings may be held by teleconference as long as the public is afforded teleconference access to the public portion of the committee meetings.

(3) The court may order a status conference to evaluate the department’s progress in locating and securing housing and in obtaining relevant assistance and consultation information from the participants listed in paragraph (1). The court may sanction any of the participants listed in paragraph (1) for failure to appear at the status conference unless the participant shows good cause for their failure to appear.

(4) This subdivision does not require the
 participants listed in paragraph (1) to perform a housing site assessment.

(e) In recommending a specific placement for community outpatient treatment, the department or its designee shall consider all of the following:

(1) The concerns and proximity of the victim or the victim’s next of kin.

(2) The age and profile of the victim or victims in the sexually violent offenses committed by the person subject to placement. For purposes of this subdivision, the “profile” of a victim includes, but is not limited to, gender, physical appearance, economic background, profession, and other social or personal characteristics.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a person
 released under this section shall not be placed within one-quarter mile of any public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, if either of the following conditions exist:

(1) The person has previously been convicted of a violation of Section 288.5 of, or subdivision (a) or (b), or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 288 of, the Penal Code.

(2) The court finds that the person has a history of improper sexual conduct with children.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if the committed person is ordered to be conditionally released in a county other than the county of commitment due to extraordinary circumstances pursuant to Section
 6608.6, the court shall order that jurisdiction of the person and all records related to the case be transferred to the court of the county of placement. Upon transfer of jurisdiction to the county of placement, the designated attorney of the county of placement shall represent the state in all further proceedings.

(2) The designated attorney of the county of commitment shall serve written notice upon the designated attorney for the county of placement within 15 court days of an order to place a committed person in the county of placement. The designated attorney of the county of placement may file an affidavit with the court in the county of commitment objecting to the transfer of jurisdiction within 15 court days after receiving the notice. If the affidavit objecting to the transfer of jurisdiction is timely filed, the court shall not
 transfer jurisdiction. If an affidavit objecting to the transfer of jurisdiction is not timely filed, paragraph (1) shall apply.

(3) For the purpose of this section, “county of placement” means the county where the court orders the committed person to be placed for conditional release.

(4) For the purpose of this section, “designated attorney of the county of placement” means the attorney designated in subdivision (l) of Section 6601 in the county of placement.

(5) This section shall not be construed to negate or in any way affect the decision of the court of the county of commitment to conditionally release the committed person in the county of placement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 816, Sec. 1.   (AB 1954)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.6.

(a) A court may make a finding of extraordinary circumstances only after the committed person’s county of domicile has petitioned the court to make this finding.

(b) The court may grant the county of domicile’s petition and make a finding of extraordinary circumstances only after all of the following have occurred:

(1) The county of domicile has demonstrated to the court that the county of domicile has engaged in an exhaustive housing search with meaningful and robust participation from the participants listed in subdivision (d) of Section 6608.5 in both committee conferences and status conferences. The
 county of domicile shall provide the court with declarations from the county of domicile and all the participants attesting to the exhaustive housing search.

(2) (A) The county of domicile has provided at least one alternative placement county for consideration and has noticed the district attorney, or district attorneys, of the alternative placement county, or counties, and the department regarding the county of domicile’s intention to petition for a finding of extraordinary circumstance.

(B) The county of domicile shall indicate, if applicable, how the committed person has a community connection to a proposed alternative placement county, including whether the committed person has previously resided, been employed, or has next of kin in a proposed
 alternative placement county.

(3) The county of domicile has provided the declarations and community connection information required by paragraphs (1) and (2) to the department and to the district attorney of a proposed alternative placement county.

(4) The department and the district attorney of a proposed alternative placement county have had an opportunity to be heard at a hearing, which shall be noticed no fewer than 30 days before the date of the hearing.

(c) (1) If the court finds that extraordinary circumstances require
 the placement to occur outside the county of domicile, the court shall state its findings on the record and the grounds supporting its findings.

(2) Extraordinary costs associated with a housing placement inside the county of domicile shall not be grounds for a finding of extraordinary circumstances.

(d) A court shall not order a search of alternative housing placements outside of the county of domicile until after the court has granted a petition finding that extraordinary circumstances exist.

(e) The Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature on an annual basis the instances in which a court issues a finding of extraordinary circumstances and shall detail the court’s findings and grounds supporting the
 findings, as stated by the court pursuant to subdivision (c). The annual report required by this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a court may order the placement of the committed person in an alternative placement county upon stipulation between the domicile county and the alternative placement county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 880, Sec. 3.   (SB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.7.

The State Department of State Hospitals may enter into an interagency agreement or contract with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or with local law enforcement agencies for services related to supervision or monitoring of sexually violent predators who have been conditionally released into the community under the forensic conditional release program pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 17.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.8.

(a) For any person who is proposed for community outpatient treatment under the forensic conditional release program, the department shall provide to the court a copy of the written contract entered into with any public or private person or entity responsible for monitoring and supervising the patient’s outpatient placement and treatment program. This subdivision does not apply to subcontracts between the contractor and clinicians providing treatment and related services to the person.

(b) The terms and conditions of conditional release shall be drafted to include reasonable flexibility to achieve the aims of conditional release, and to protect the public and the conditionally released person.

(c) The court in its discretion may order the department to, notwithstanding Section 4514 or 5328, provide a copy of the written terms and conditions of conditional release to the sheriff or chief of police, or both, that have jurisdiction over the proposed or actual placement community.

(d) (1) Except in an emergency, the department or its designee shall not alter the terms and conditions of conditional release without the prior approval of the court.

(2) The department shall provide notice to the person committed under this article and the district attorney or designated
 county counsel of any proposed change in the terms and conditions of conditional release.

(3) The court on its own motion, or upon the motion of either party to the action, may set a hearing on the proposed change. The hearing shall be held as soon as is practicable.

(4) If a hearing on the proposed change is held, the court shall state its findings on the record. If the court approves a change in the terms and conditions of conditional release without a hearing, the court shall issue a written order.

(5) In the case of an emergency, the department or its designee may deviate from the terms and conditions of the conditional release if necessary to protect public safety or the safety of the person. If a hearing on the emergency is set by the court or requested by either party, the hearing shall be held as soon as
 practicable. The department, its designee, and the parties shall endeavor to resolve routine matters in a cooperative fashion without the need for a formal hearing.

(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, including, but not limited to, subdivision (d), matters concerning the residential placement, including any changes or proposed changes in the residence of the person, shall be considered and determined pursuant to Section 6609.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 302, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.9.

(a) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Department of State Hospitals shall conduct an analysis of the benefits and feasibility of establishing transitional housing facilities for the conditional release program, and submit the findings of the analysis in a report to the Legislature.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   (SB 380)   Effective October 10, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6609.

Within 10 days of a request made by the chief of police of a city or the sheriff of a county, the State Department of State Hospitals shall provide the following information concerning each person committed as a sexually violent predator who is receiving outpatient care in a conditional release program in that city or county: name, address, date of commitment, county from which committed, date of placement in the conditional release program, fingerprints, and a glossy photograph no smaller than 318 × 318 inches in size, or clear copies of the
 fingerprints and photograph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 18.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6609.1.

(a) (1) When the State Department of State Hospitals makes a recommendation to the court for community outpatient treatment for any person committed as a sexually violent predator, or when a person who is committed as a sexually violent predator pursuant to this article has petitioned a court pursuant to Section 6608 for conditional release under supervision and treatment in the community pursuant to a conditional release program, or has petitioned a court pursuant to Section 6608 for subsequent unconditional discharge, and the department is notified, or is aware, of the filing of the petition, and when a community placement location is recommended or proposed, the department shall notify the sheriff or chief of
 police, or both, the district attorney, or the county’s designated counsel, that have jurisdiction over the following locations:

(A) The community in which the person may be released for community outpatient treatment.

(B) The community in which the person maintained their last legal residence as defined by Section 3003 of the Penal Code.

(C) The county that filed for the person’s civil commitment pursuant to this article.

(2) The department shall also notify the Sexually Violent Predator Parole Coordinator of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, if the person is otherwise subject to parole pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of
 Chapter 8 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code. The department shall also notify the Department of Justice.

(3) The notice shall be given when the department or its designee makes a recommendation under subdivision (e) of Section 6608 or proposes a placement location without making a recommendation, or when any other person proposes a placement location to the court and the department or its designee is made aware of the proposal.

(4) The notice shall be given at least 30 days prior to the department’s submission of its recommendation to the court in those cases in which the department recommended community outpatient treatment under Section 6607, or in which the department or its designee is recommending or proposing a placement location, or in the case of a petition
 or placement proposal by someone other than the department or its designee, within 48 hours after becoming aware of the petition or placement proposal.

(5) The notice shall state that it is being made under this section and include all of the following information concerning each person committed as a sexually violent predator who is proposed or is petitioning to receive outpatient care in a conditional release program in that city or county:

(A) The name, proposed placement address, date of commitment, county from which committed, proposed date of placement in the conditional release program, fingerprints, and a glossy photograph no smaller than 318 by
 318 inches in size, or clear copies of the fingerprints and photograph.

(B) The date, place, and time of the court hearing at which the location of placement is to be considered and a proof of service attesting to the notice’s mailing in accordance with this subdivision.

(C) A list of agencies that are being provided this notice and the addresses to which the notices are being sent.

(6) The notice shall be sent electronically and by certified mail. The timeframe for notice provisions under this section begins when the notice is sent.

(b) Those agencies receiving the notice referred
 to in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) may provide written comment to the department and the court regarding the impending release, placement, location, and conditions of release. All community agency comments shall be combined and consolidated. The written comment shall be filed with the court at the time that the comment is provided to the department. The written comment shall identify differences between the comment filed with the court and that provided to the department, if any. In addition, a single agency in the community of the specific proposed or recommended placement address may suggest appropriate, alternative locations for placement within that community. A copy of the suggested alternative placement location shall be filed with the court at the time that the suggested placement location is provided to the department. The State Department of State Hospitals shall issue a written
 statement to the commenting agencies and to the court within 10 days of receiving the written comments with a determination as to whether to adjust the release location or general terms and conditions, and explaining the basis for its decision. In lieu of responding to the individual community agencies or individuals, the department’s statement responding to the community comment shall be in the form of a public statement.

(c) The agencies’ comments and department’s statements shall be considered by the court which shall, based on those comments and statements, approve, modify, or reject the department’s recommendation or proposal regarding the community or specific address to which the person is scheduled to be released or the conditions that shall apply to the release if the court finds that the department’s recommendation or proposal is
 not appropriate.

(d) (1) When the State Department of State Hospitals makes a recommendation to pursue recommitment, makes a recommendation not to pursue recommitment, or seeks a judicial review of commitment status pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 6605, of any person committed as a sexually violent predator, it shall provide written notice of that action to the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and to the district attorney, that have jurisdiction over the following locations:

(A) The community in which the person maintained their last legal residence as defined by Section 3003 of the Penal Code.

(B) The community in which the person will probably be released, if recommending not to pursue
 recommitment.

(C) The county that filed for the person’s civil commitment pursuant to this article.

(2) The State Department of State Hospitals shall also notify the Sexually Violent Predator Parole Coordinator of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, if the person is otherwise subject to parole pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Chapter 8 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code. The State Department of State Hospitals shall also notify the Department of Justice. The notice shall be made at least 15 days prior to the department’s submission of its recommendation to the court.

(3) Those agencies receiving the notice referred to in this subdivision shall have 15 days from receipt of the notice
 to provide written comment to the department regarding the impending release. At the time that the written comment is made to the department, a copy of the written comment shall be filed with the court by the agency or agencies making the comment. Those comments shall be considered by the department, which may modify its decision regarding the community in which the person is scheduled to be released, based on those comments.

(e) (1) If the court orders the release of a sexually violent predator, the court shall notify the Sexually Violent Predator Parole Coordinator of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall notify the Department of Justice, the State Department of State Hospitals,
 the sheriff or chief of police, or both, and the district attorney, that have jurisdiction over the following locations:

(A) The community in which the person is to be released.

(B) The community in which the person maintained their last legal residence as defined in Section 3003 of the Penal Code.

(2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall make the notifications required by this subdivision regardless of whether the person released will be serving a term of parole after release by the court.

(f) If the person is otherwise subject to parole pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Chapter 8 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the